test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-durak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - durak e-stem tomppeli: # Noun - full paradigm
     durak+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: durak
     durak+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: duraak
     durak+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: duraak
     durak+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: durakka
     durak+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: duraakast
     durak+N+Sg+Com+Indef: duraakin
     durak+N+Ess+Indef: duraaken
     durak+N+Par+Indef: duraaked
     durak+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [duraaktaa, duraaktää]
     durak+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: duraak
     durak+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: duraaki
     durak+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: duraakid
     durak+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: duraakid
     durak+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: duraakin
     durak+N+Pl+Com+Indef: duraakivuiʹm
     durak+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [duraakitaa, duraakitää]
